viceverser/data/fr_ud.aff
FLAG long
SFX iA Y 25
SFX iA dvenir dvenir/ venir  is:infi
SFX iA dvenir dvenant/ venir  is:ppre
SFX iA dvenir dvenu/ venir  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX iA dvenir dvenus/ venir  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX iA dvenir dvenue/ venir  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX iA dvenir dvenu·e/ venir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX iA dvenir dvenues/ venir  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX iA dvenir dvenu·es/ venir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX iA dvenir dvient/ venir  is:ipre is:3sg
SFX iA dvenir dviennent/ venir  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX iA dvenir dvenait/ venir  is:iimp is:3sg
SFX iA dvenir dvenaient/ venir  is:iimp is:3pl
SFX iA dvenir dvint/ venir  is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX iA dvenir dvinrent/ venir  is:ipsi is:3pl!
SFX iA dvenir dviendra/ venir  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX iA dvenir dviendront/ venir  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX iA dvenir dviendrait/ venir  is:cond is:3sg
SFX iA dvenir dviendraient/ venir  is:cond is:3pl
SFX iA dvenir dvienne/ venir  is:spre is:3sg
SFX iA dvenir dvînt/ venir  is:simp is:3sg
SFX iA dvenir dvinssent/ venir  is:simp is:3pl
SFX iA dvenir dvenu-e/ venir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX iA dvenir dvenu-es/ venir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX iA dvenir dvenu·e·s/ venir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX iA dvenir dvenu-e-s/ venir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl

SFX iB Y 40
SFX iB partenir partenir/ tenir  is:infi
SFX iB partenir partenant/ tenir  is:ppre
SFX iB partenir partenu/ tenir  is:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX iB partenir partiens/ tenir  is:ipre is:1sg is:2sg
SFX iB partenir partient/ tenir  is:ipre is:3sg
SFX iB partenir partenons/ tenir  is:ipre is:1pl
SFX iB partenir partenez/ tenir  is:ipre is:2pl
SFX iB partenir partiennent/ tenir  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX iB partenir partenais/ tenir  is:iimp is:1sg is:2sg
SFX iB partenir partenait/ tenir  is:iimp is:3sg
SFX iB partenir partenions/ tenir  is:iimp is:spre is:1pl
SFX iB partenir parteniez/ tenir  is:iimp is:spre is:2pl
SFX iB partenir partenaient/ tenir  is:iimp is:3pl
SFX iB partenir partins/ tenir  is:ipsi is:1sg is:2sg
SFX iB partenir partint/ tenir  is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX iB partenir partînmes/ tenir  is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX iB partenir partîntes/ tenir  is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX iB partenir partinrent/ tenir  is:ipsi is:3pl!
SFX iB partenir partiendrai/ tenir  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX iB partenir partiendras/ tenir  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX iB partenir partiendra/ tenir  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX iB partenir partiendrons/ tenir  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX iB partenir partiendrez/ tenir  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX iB partenir partiendront/ tenir  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX iB partenir partiendrais/ tenir  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX iB partenir partiendrait/ tenir  is:cond is:3sg
SFX iB partenir partiendrions/ tenir  is:cond is:1pl
SFX iB partenir partiendriez/ tenir  is:cond is:2pl
SFX iB partenir partiendraient/ tenir  is:cond is:3pl
SFX iB partenir partienne/ tenir  is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX iB partenir partiennes/ tenir  is:spre is:2sg
SFX iB partenir partinsse/ tenir  is:simp is:1sg
SFX iB partenir partinsses/ tenir  is:simp is:2sg
SFX iB partenir partînt/ tenir  is:simp is:3sg
SFX iB partenir partinssions/ tenir  is:simp is:1pl
SFX iB partenir partinssiez/ tenir  is:simp is:2pl
SFX iB partenir partinssent/ tenir  is:simp is:3pl
SFX iB partenir partiens/ tenir  is:impe is:2sg
SFX iB partenir partenons/ tenir  is:impe is:1pl
SFX iB partenir partenez/ tenir  is:impe is:2pl

SFX iC Y 47
SFX iC rir rir/ [vf]rir  is:infi
SFX iC rir rant/ [vf]rir  is:ppre
SFX iC rir ert/ [vf]rir  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX iC rir erts/ [vf]rir  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX iC rir erte/ [vf]rir  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX iC rir ert·e/ [vf]rir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX iC rir ertes/ [vf]rir  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX iC rir ert·es/ [vf]rir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX iC rir re/ [vf]rir  is:ipre is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX iC rir res/ [vf]rir  is:ipre is:spre is:2sg
SFX iC rir rons/ [vf]rir  is:ipre is:1pl
SFX iC rir rez/ [vf]rir  is:ipre is:2pl
SFX iC rir rent/ [vf]rir  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX iC rir rais/ [vf]rir  is:iimp is:1sg is:2sg
SFX iC rir rait/ [vf]rir  is:iimp is:3sg
SFX iC rir rions/ [vf]rir  is:iimp is:spre is:1pl
SFX iC rir riez/ [vf]rir  is:iimp is:spre is:2pl
SFX iC rir raient/ [vf]rir  is:iimp is:3pl
SFX iC rir ris/ [vf]rir  is:ipsi is:1sg is:2sg
SFX iC rir rit/ [vf]rir  is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX iC rir rîmes/ [vf]rir  is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX iC rir rîtes/ [vf]rir  is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX iC rir rirent/ [vf]rir  is:ipsi is:3pl!
SFX iC rir rirai/ [vf]rir  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX iC rir riras/ [vf]rir  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX iC rir rira/ [vf]rir  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX iC rir rirons/ [vf]rir  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX iC rir rirez/ [vf]rir  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX iC rir riront/ [vf]rir  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX iC rir rirais/ [vf]rir  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX iC rir rirait/ [vf]rir  is:cond is:3sg
SFX iC rir ririons/ [vf]rir  is:cond is:1pl
SFX iC rir ririez/ [vf]rir  is:cond is:2pl
SFX iC rir riraient/ [vf]rir  is:cond is:3pl
SFX iC rir risse/ [vf]rir  is:simp is:1sg
SFX iC rir risses/ [vf]rir  is:simp is:2sg
SFX iC rir rît/ [vf]rir  is:simp is:3sg
SFX iC rir rissions/ [vf]rir  is:simp is:1pl
SFX iC rir rissiez/ [vf]rir  is:simp is:2pl
SFX iC rir rissent/ [vf]rir  is:simp is:3pl
SFX iC rir re/ [vf]rir  is:impe is:2sg
SFX iC rir rons/ [vf]rir  is:impe is:1pl
SFX iC rir rez/ [vf]rir  is:impe is:2pl
SFX iC rir ert-e/ [vf]rir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX iC rir ert-es/ [vf]rir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX iC rir ert·e·s/ [vf]rir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX iC rir ert-e-s/ [vf]rir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl

SFX iD Y 49
SFX iD courir courir/ courir  is:infi
SFX iD courir courant/ courir  is:ppre
SFX iD courir couru/ courir  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX iD courir courus/ courir  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX iD courir courue/ courir  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX iD courir couru·e/ courir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX iD courir courues/ courir  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX iD courir couru·es/ courir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX iD courir cours/ courir  is:ipre is:1sg is:2sg
SFX iD courir court/ courir  is:ipre is:3sg
SFX iD courir courons/ courir  is:ipre is:1pl
SFX iD courir courez/ courir  is:ipre is:2pl
SFX iD courir courent/ courir  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX iD courir courais/ courir  is:iimp is:1sg is:2sg
SFX iD courir courait/ courir  is:iimp is:3sg
SFX iD courir courions/ courir  is:iimp is:spre is:1pl
SFX iD courir couriez/ courir  is:iimp is:spre is:2pl
SFX iD courir couraient/ courir  is:iimp is:3pl
SFX iD courir courus/ courir  is:ipsi is:1sg is:2sg
SFX iD courir courut/ courir  is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX iD courir courûmes/ courir  is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX iD courir courûtes/ courir  is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX iD courir coururent/ courir  is:ipsi is:3pl!
SFX iD courir courrai/ courir  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX iD courir courras/ courir  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX iD courir courra/ courir  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX iD courir courrons/ courir  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX iD courir courrez/ courir  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX iD courir courront/ courir  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX iD courir courrais/ courir  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX iD courir courrait/ courir  is:cond is:3sg
SFX iD courir courrions/ courir  is:cond is:1pl
SFX iD courir courriez/ courir  is:cond is:2pl
SFX iD courir courraient/ courir  is:cond is:3pl
SFX iD courir coure/ courir  is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX iD courir coures/ courir  is:spre is:2sg
SFX iD courir courusse/ courir  is:simp is:1sg
SFX iD courir courusses/ courir  is:simp is:2sg
SFX iD courir courût/ courir  is:simp is:3sg
SFX iD courir courussions/ courir  is:simp is:1pl
SFX iD courir courussiez/ courir  is:simp is:2pl
SFX iD courir courussent/ courir  is:simp is:3pl
SFX iD courir cours/ courir  is:impe is:2sg
SFX iD courir courons/ courir  is:impe is:1pl
SFX iD courir courez/ courir  is:impe is:2pl
SFX iD courir couru-e/ courir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX iD courir couru-es/ courir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX iD courir couru·e·s/ courir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX iD courir couru-e-s/ courir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
