viceverser/data/fr_ud.dic
accourir/iD  po:verb
advenir/iA  po:verb
appartenir/iB  po:verb
concourir/iD  po:verb
couvrir/iC  po:verb
découvrir/iC  po:verb
discourir/iD  po:verb
entrouvrir/iC  po:verb
offrir/iC  po:verb
ouvrir/iC  po:verb
recourir/iD  po:verb
recouvrir/iC  po:verb
redécouvrir/iC  po:verb
rentrouvrir/iC  po:verb
rouvrir/iC  po:verb
souffrir/iC  po:verb
